South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3771.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 1, Chapter 23, Title 50 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 50-23-37.  (A) An owner of a watercraft that is anchored in the coastal waters of this State more than fourteen days must obtain a marine survey on his watercraft indicating the watercraft is seaworthy and functions as intended. (B) To obtain a marine survey, the watercraft owner must use a licensed surveyor to inspect the following: (1) all sailboats must have a complete set of working sails and, if the sailboat includes an inboard or outboard motor, mechanical propulsion capable of moving the watercraft; (2) motorboats must have working propulsion mechanisms capable of moving the watercraft; (3) all liveaboard watercraft must have a marine toilet system that meets United States Coast Guard standards or receipts that reflect a monthly pump out. Unpowered structures may not be used as liveaboards unless docked at a marina; (4) watercraft must be free of hull leaks and must have the ability to be closed up and secured when the owner is not on board; (5) all watercraft must have a working bilge pump, charged battery for powering the bilge pump, and solar or equivalent power source for recharging the battery; and (6) all watercraft must have working anchor lights. (C) The marine survey must be completed within twenty-one days of any watercraft being anchored in the coastal waters of this State. The survey is effective for a period two years. (D) Upon the successful completion of the marine survey, the surveyor shall issue two 3 Â½ x 3 Â½ inch watercraft stickers to the owner of the watercraft. The sticker must be displayed on the watercraft adjacent to the annual state registration sticker. Declared vessels must display the sticker where a state registration sticker would normally be displayed on the hull of the vessel. The sticker must include: (1) the expiring year in one inch font; (2) the name of the survey company; (3) the date of the survey; and (4) the boat registration number. (E) A person who violates this provision is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, must be fined not more than five hundred dollars or imprisoned not more than thirty days. Each day of non-compliance is considered to be a separate offense. After twenty-one days of noncompliance with this section, a watercraft is deemed abandoned pursuant to Article 2, Chapter 21, of Title 50. (F) The department may grant exemptions from the requirements of this section. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----